apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
	<pardef n="твърд/и__vblex">  <!-- imperf"/><s n="tv -->
	  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>я</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>иш</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>им</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR"> 	   <p>          <l>име</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ите</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ят</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ях</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яхме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яхте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яха</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ял</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яла</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яло</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яли</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящ</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящия</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящият</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яща</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящата</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящо</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящото</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящи</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ящите</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ях</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>я</l>           <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>я</l>           <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яхме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яхте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яха</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ял</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялия</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялият</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яла</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялата</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яло</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялото</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яли</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ялите</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ян</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яния</l>      <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яният</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яна</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яната</l>   <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яно</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яното</l>       <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ени</l>     <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ените</l>   <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ейки</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>







	<!-- 3 спрежение, аорист на -АХ и -ЯХ-->
	<!-- несвършен вид
					-->

	<e lm="върти"><i>върт</i><par n="твърд/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="твърди"><i>твърд</i><par n="твърд/и__vblex"/></e>
